Washington statutes.
RCW 15.88.140

Referendum determining grower participation—Effect.

(1) For purposes of determining grower participation in the commission and assessment under RCW 15.88.130, the director shall conduct a referendum among all vinifera grape growers within the state. The requirements of assent or approval of the referendum will be held to be complied with if: (a) At least fifty-one percent by numbers of growers replying in the referendum vote affirmatively or at least fifty-one percent by acreage of those growers replying in the referendum vote affirmatively; and (b) thirty percent of all vinifera grape growers and thirty percent by acreage have been represented in the referendum to determine assent or approval of participation and assessment. The referendum shall be conducted on or before September 15, 1988.

(2) If the director determines that the requisite assent has been given, the director shall direct the commission to put into force the assessment in RCW 15.88.130.

(3) If the director determines that the requisite assent has not been given, the director shall direct the commission not to levy the assessment provided in RCW 15.88.130. If the requisite assent has not been given, the commission shall not continue to specifically foster the interests of vinifera grape growers.

[ 1988 c 257 s 3.]